Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Part 1 General Provisions
Blocks (010104): 2022 2023

VTD: 062 Snowhill

Blocks (010101): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2015 2016 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 3011 3012 3013 3017

Blocks (010103): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2009 2010 2011 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2031 2032 2033 2034

VTD: 063 Summit

VTD: 066 Dallas

Blocks (010303): 2026 2027

Blocks (010304): 2000 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 3010 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023

Blocks (010305): 1055 1056 1057

VTD: 070 Ganns

VTD: 071 Lakesite

VTD: 073 Middle Valley

VTD: 075 Pleasant Grove 1

VTD: 088 Hixson 2

VTD: 090 Harrison 2

Blocks (010101): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1009 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1028 1029 2014 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2055

Blocks (011201): 1013 1014

Blocks (011413): 5003 5007 5008 5009 5010 5011 5012 5013 5014 5018

Blocks (011447): 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1023 1032 1038 2000 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012

VTD: 098 Harrison 3

Blocks (011413): 2000 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 3003 3005

VTD: 101 Hixson 3

VTD: 103 Pleasant Grove 2

VTD: 139 North Chattanooga 2

Blocks (000600): 1002 1014 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2027 2036 3002 3003 3006 3009 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3034

Blocks (000700): 1027 1028 3024 3025

VTD: 144 Soddy Daisy 3

Blocks (010411): 4005 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4031 4038 4044

Blocks (010412): 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1016 1017 4000 4012

VTD: 144 Stuart Heights 2

VTD: 164 Hixson 4*

VTD: 166 Summit 2

Blocks (011413): 5015 5016 5017

District 27:

Hamilton County

VTD: 033 Mountain Creek 1

VTD: 037 Northwoods 1

VTD: 038 Northwoods 2

VTD: 043 St Elmo 1

Blocks (001800): 1003 1004 1005 1009 1015 1027 1028 1029 1030 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1099 2000 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067

Blocks (001900): 2052 2057 3000 3001 3002 3004 3005 3006 3044

VTD: 048 Lookout Valley 1

VTD: 065 Bakewell

Blocks (010201): 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1018 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2008 2009 2015 2022 2023 2025 2026 3022 3023 3037 3038 3040 3041 3042 3043 3046 3047 3048 3054

Blocks (010202): 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1051 1052 1053 1054 3010 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3043 3044 3045 3049

Blocks (010305): 1006 1007

Blocks (011001): 1014 1015 1016 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1040 1041 1043

VTD: 067 Fairmount

VTD: 068 Falling Water 1

VTD: 069 Flat Top Mountain

VTD: 072 Lookout Mountain 1

VTD: 074 Mowbray

VTD: 076 Red Bank 1

VTD: 077 Red Bank 2

VTD: 078 Red Bank 3

VTD: 081 Signal Mountain East

VTD: 082 Signal Mountain West

VTD: 083 Soddy Daisy 1

VTD: 084 Soddy Daisy 2

VTD: 085 Valdeau

VTD: 086 Walden

VTD: 092 Lookout Valley 2

VTD: 102 Northwoods 5

VTD: 106 Mountain Creek 2

VTD: 109 Falling Water 2

VTD: 111 Lookout Valley 3*

VTD: 119 Northwoods 3

VTD: 121 Lookout Mountain 2

VTD: 125 Red Bank 4

VTD: 127 Red Bank 6

VTD: 137 St. Elmo 2

VTD: 138 St. Elmo 3

Blocks (001800): 1013 1014 1016 1017 1018 1019 1023 1025 1026 1033 1035 1101

VTD: 144 Soddy Daisy 3

Blocks (010201): 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 2024 2030 2031

VTD: 148 Soddy Daisy 4

VTD: 160 St Elmo 4

VTD: 161 Lookout Valley 4

VTD: 162 Northwoods 4*

VTD: 165 Soddy Daisy 5*

District 28:

Hamilton County

VTD: 002 Alton Park

VTD: 003 Amnicola

VTD: 004 Avondale

VTD: 005 Bonny Oaks

VTD: 008 Bushtown

VTD: 011 Clifton Hills 1

Blocks (002300): 1000 1002 1009 1012 1013 1019 1020 1021 1022 1026 1027 1051

Blocks (002500): 2004 2005 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3019 3020 3021 3034 3035

Blocks (002600): 1028 1029 1030 2039 3047 3048

VTD: 013 Courthouse

Blocks (000400): 1001 1002 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054

Blocks (001100): 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019

Blocks (003100): 1049 1050 1051 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1082 1083 1084 1085 1088 1089 1105 1106 1107 1108 1125 1126

Blocks (012400): 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3050 3051 3052 3053 3054 3055 3056 3057 3058 3059 3060 3061 3062 3063 3064 3065 3066 3067 3068 3069 3070 3071 3072 3073 3074 3075 3076

VTD: 014 Dalewood

VTD: 015 Downtown

Blocks (001600): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1060 1061 1062 1065 1066 1067 1068

Blocks (002000): 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1038 1039 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1082 1083 1084 1085 1087 1088 1089 1090 1125 1126 1140 1141

Blocks (003100): 1004 1005 1029 1030 1095 1096 1097 1098 1099 1112 1113 1114 1115 1119 1120 1121 1131 1132 1133 1134 1135 1139 1140

VTD: 018 East Chattanooga 1

VTD: 020 East Side 1

VTD: 021 Eastdale 1

VTD: 023 Glenwood

VTD: 024 Highland Park

Blocks (001100): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054

Blocks (001200): 1010

Blocks (001400): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1029 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1043 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017

VTD: 026 Howard

VTD: 027 Kingsport

VTD: 028 Lake Hills

VTD: 031 Missionary Ridge

Blocks (001200): 1011 1012

Blocks (002900): 2004 2005 2006 2007 2010 2011 2012

VTD: 032 Moccasin Bend

VTD: 034 Murray Hills

VTD: 040 Piney Woods

VTD: 041 Ridgedale

Blocks (001300): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1053 1054 1055 1061 1062 2003 2004 2006 2007 2019 2020 2021 2029 2030 2033 2034 2035 2036 2042

Blocks (002600): 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1035 1036

VTD: 043 St Elmo 1

Blocks (001800): 1007 1008 1010 1012

VTD: 045 Sunnyside

Blocks (002900): 1001 1004 1005 1006 2000 2001 2002 2003 2008 2009 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018

VTD: 049 Woodmore

VTD: 061 Ridgeside

VTD: 094 Eastgate 1

VTD: 098 Harrison 3

Blocks (011413): 3004 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3024 3025 3031 3032 3038

VTD: 117 Mountain Creek 4

VTD: 131 Eastdale 2

VTD: 132 East Side 2

VTD: 133 Clifton Hills 2

VTD: 138 St. Elmo 3

Blocks (001800): 1011

VTD: 139 North Chattanooga 2

Blocks (000600): 1013

VTD: 140 Harrison 4

District 29:

Hamilton County

VTD: 001 Airport 1

VTD: 006 Brainerd

Blocks (003000): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2044

VTD: 007 Brainerd Hills

Blocks (003400): 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030

Blocks (011445): 1034 1036

VTD: 046 Tyner 1

VTD: 050 Apison 1

Blocks (011204): 3012

VTD: 051 Birchwood

Blocks (010104): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 2000 2004 2005 2008 2009 2010 2021 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4032 4033 4034 4035 4036 4037 4038 4039 4040

VTD: 052 Collegedale 1

Blocks (011201): 5048 5049 5061 5062 5063 5064 5065 5066 5075 5076 5077 5078 5079 5080 5083 5085 5086

Blocks (011203): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1014 1015 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 2001 2002 3001 3005

Blocks (011204): 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1027 1028 1030 1032 2000 2001 3006 3013

Blocks (011311): 4011 4014 4034 4035 4036 5019 5020 5021

VTD: 059 Meadowview

Blocks (010103): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1025 1026 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1036 1044 1045

Blocks (010104): 2001 2002 2003 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2025 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047

VTD: 060 Ooltewah 1

Blocks (011201): 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1028 1029 1030 1031 1033 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1048 1049 1050 1051 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 3000 3001 3002 3003 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3012 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4020 4021 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 5000 5001 5002 5003 5004 5005 5006 5007 5008 5009 5010 5011 5012 5013 5014 5015 5016 5017 5018 5019 5020 5028 5029 5030 5031 5032 5033 5034 5035 5036 5037 5038 5039 5040 5041 5042 5043 5044 5045 5046 5047 5050 5051 5052 5053 5054 5055 5056 5057 5058 5059 5060 5067 5068 5069 5070 5071 5072 5073 5074 5081 5082 5084

Blocks (011204): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1026 1031 3007

Blocks (011311): 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4013 4015 4016 4029 4030 4031 4032 4033 4038

Blocks (011447): 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008

VTD: 062 Snowhill

Blocks (010101): 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3014 3015 3016 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036

Blocks (010103): 1021 1022 1023 1024 1027 1034 1035 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1046 1047 1048 2008 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2030 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043

Blocks (010104): 2024

Blocks (011201): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 3004 3010 3011 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3028

VTD: 065 Bakewell

Blocks (010201): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1029 1030 1031 1032 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3007 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3039 3044 3045

Blocks (010202): 3014 3017 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 3046 3047 3048 3050 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029

VTD: 066 Dallas

Blocks (010303): 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 2000 2001 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2035 2036 2037 2038

Blocks (010304): 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2018 3000 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3011 3012

Blocks (010305): 1018 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1044 1045 1046 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1058 1059 1060 1061

Blocks (010306): 1048 1050 2016 2051 2052

VTD: 080 Sale Creek

VTD: 089 Ooltewah 2

VTD: 090 Harrison 2

Blocks (010101): 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1010 1011 1012 1013 1024 1025 1026 1027 1030

Blocks (011201): 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012

Blocks (011413): 5000 5001

Blocks (011447): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037

VTD: 093 Concord 2

Blocks (011311): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1010 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 5004 5011 5013 5041

Blocks (011321): 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4021 4022

Blocks (011323): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013

VTD: 095 Eastgate 2

Blocks (002900): 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028

Blocks (003000): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026

Blocks (003300): 1009 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021

VTD: 097 Tyner 2

VTD: 112 Airport 2

VTD: 118 Apison 2

Blocks (011203): 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1022

VTD: 122 Collegedale 2

VTD: 130 Tyner 4

VTD: 141 Concord 3

VTD: 143 Ooltewah 3*

VTD: 154 Airport 4

VTD: 166 Summit 2

Blocks (011311): 2000 2011 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 4004 4005 4012 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4028 4037 4039 4040 4041 4042 4043 5026 5040

Blocks (011443): 2000

Blocks (011447): 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037

Blocks (980200): 1146 1167

District 30:

Hamilton County

VTD: 006 Brainerd

Blocks (002800): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1023 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018

Blocks (003000): 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2043 2045 2046 2047

Blocks (011442): 1006

Blocks (011600): 1000 1004 2000 2004 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3016

Blocks (011700): 1000 1001 2000 3000 3001

VTD: 007 Brainerd Hills

Blocks (003400): 2028

Blocks (011442): 1005

VTD: 009 Cedar Hill

VTD: 011 Clifton Hills 1

Blocks (002500): 3018 3022 3023 3024 3027 3032 3033 3036 3037 3038

VTD: 012 Concord 1

VTD: 017 East Brainerd 1

VTD: 019 East Lake

VTD: 024 Highland Park

Blocks (001300): 2001

VTD: 031 Missionary Ridge

Blocks (001300): 2000 2008 2010

Blocks (002400): 1000 1001 1002 1004 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025

Blocks (002500): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042

Blocks (002600): 1000 1001

Blocks (002800): 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3010 3022 3025 3027

VTD: 041 Ridgedale

Blocks (001300): 2002 2005 2009 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2031 2032 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2043 2044

Blocks (002500): 1020

Blocks (002600): 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1020 1033 1034

VTD: 045 Sunnyside

Blocks (002800): 3000 3001 3002 3003 3009 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3023 3028 3029 3030 3031 3042 3043 3044 3045

VTD: 050 Apison 1

Blocks (011203): 2011 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2040 2041 2042 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049

Blocks (011204): 2002 2003 2011 2017 2019 2020 3004 3008 3014 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3050 3051 3052 3053 3054 3055 3056 3057 3058 4000 4001 4002 4003 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4013 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4032 4033 4034

VTD: 052 Collegedale 1

Blocks (011203): 2000 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2021 2022 2024 2025 2026 2028 2029 2030 2031 2037 2038 2039 2043 2044

Blocks (011204): 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1029 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2018 3005 3009 3010 3011 3015 3016 3017 3018

VTD: 053 East Ridge 1

VTD: 054 East Ridge 2

VTD: 055 East Ridge 3

VTD: 056 East Ridge 4

VTD: 057 East Ridge 5

VTD: 060 Ooltewah 1

Blocks (011203): 2019 2020 2023 2027

Blocks (011204): 3000 3001 3002 3003

VTD: 064 Westview 1

VTD: 091 Westview 2

VTD: 093 Concord 2

Blocks (011321): 4020

Blocks (011323): 2004 2005 2019

VTD: 095 Eastgate 2

Blocks (002800): 1022 1024

Blocks (003000): 2006 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2042

VTD: 096 Westview 3

VTD: 104 East Brainerd 2

VTD: 118 Apison 2

Blocks (011203): 1016 3000 3002 3003 3004 3006 3007 3008 3009

Blocks (011204): 4004 4005 4011 4012 4014 4021

District 31:

Bledsoe County

Rhea County

Roane County

VTD: Eureka

VTD: Glen Alice

VTD: Rockwood Ward 1

Sequatchie County

District 32:

Loudon County

VTD: Eatons

Blocks (060100): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1022 1024

Blocks (060301): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2040 2042 2044

Blocks (060302): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1013 1014 1015 1016 1040

VTD: Glendale

Blocks (060202): 1152

Blocks (060302): 4072

Blocks (060400): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2071 2123 2125 2126 2127 2128 2129 2130

VTD: Highland Park

VTD: Lenoir City

Blocks (060201): 2200 2201

Blocks (060202): 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1089 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1099 1100 1101 1102 1103 1105 1106 1107 1108 1109 1110 1111 1112 1113 1114 1115 1116 1117 1118 1119 1120 1121 1122 1123 1124 1125 1126 1127 1128 1129 1130 1131 1132 1133 1134 1135 1136 1137 1138 1139 1140 1141 1142 1143 1144 1145 1146 1147 1148 1149 1150 1151 1153 1154 1155 1156 1157 1158 1159 1160 1161 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2009 2010 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2071 2072 2073 2074 2075 2076 2077 2078 2079 2080 2081 3035 3036 3037 3038 3052 3056 3057 3060 3061 3062 3063 3064 3065 3066 3067 3068 3069 3070 3071 3072 3073 3074 3075 3076 3077 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4018 4019 4023 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4032 4033 4034 4035 4036 4037 4038 4039 4040 4041 4042 4043 4044 4045 4046

Blocks (060301): 2043 2045 2046 2047 2048 2050 2051 2053 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2071 2072 2073 2074 2075 2085 2087 2088 2089 2090 2091 2092 2093 2101 2102 2104 2107 2112 2114 2115 2116 2117 2118 2120 2121 2122 2123 2124 2125 2126 2132 2133 2134 2135 2136

Blocks (060302): 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 4047 4062 4085 4088 4089 4090 4091 4092 4093 4100 4101 4109 4110 4111 4114

VTD: Lenoir City Outside

Blocks (060301): 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2037 2049 2052 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2096 2097 2098 2103 2108 2109 2113 2127 2128 2129 2130 2131 2137

Blocks (060302): 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3044 3045 4063 4064 4069 4070 4071 4079 4080 4081 4082 4083 4084 4086 4087 4094 4095 4096 4097 4098 4099

Roane County

VTD: Cave Creek

VTD: Cherokee

VTD: Dyllis

VTD: Emory

VTD: Emory Heights

VTD: Fairview

VTD: Harriman Ward 1

VTD: Johnson School House

VTD: Kingston Ward 1

VTD: Kingston Ward 2

VTD: Lawnville

VTD: Midtown

VTD: Midway

VTD: Oak Hills

VTD: Oliver Springs

VTD: Orchard View

VTD: Paint Rock

VTD: Paw Paw

VTD: Renfro

VTD: Rockwood Ward 2

VTD: South Harriman

District 33:

Anderson County

VTD: Block House Valley

VTD: Briceville

VTD: Claxton

VTD: Clinch Valley

Blocks (020902): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2005 2006 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2040 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2062 2063 2064 2065 2086 2091 2117 2118 2119 3008 3011 3026 3027

VTD: Clinton

VTD: Clinton High

VTD: Clinton Middle School

VTD: Dutch Valley

VTD: Emory Valley

VTD: Fairview

Blocks (020902): 3028 3032 3033 3037 3038 3039 3040 3049 3050 3051 3052 3053 3054 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4032 4033

VTD: Glen Alpine

VTD: Glenwood

VTD: Hendrix Creek

VTD: Highland View

VTD: Lake City

Blocks (020800): 1050 1056 1057 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1097 1098 1102 1112 1113 1114 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2031 2034 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2069 2073 2078 2079

VTD: Lake City Middle School

Blocks (020700): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1027 1028 1032 1033 1034 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053

Blocks (020800): 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1081 1082 1096 1143 2030 2032 2033 2035 2036 2037 2056 2068 2070 2071 2072 2074 2075 2076 2077 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3050 3051 3052 3053 3054 3055 3056 3057 3058 3059 3060 3061 3062 3063 3064 3066

Blocks (021201): 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3024 3031 3032 3033 4008 4009 4010 4011 4013

VTD: Marlow

VTD: North Clinton

VTD: Norwood

VTD: Oak Ridge City Hall

VTD: Pine Valley

VTD: Robertsville

VTD: Rosedale

VTD: South Clinton

VTD: Tri-County

VTD: West Hills

VTD: Woodland

District 34:

Rutherford County

VTD: 07-1 Blackman Elementary School

Blocks (040701): 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1083

Blocks (040808): 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2014 2015 2020 2021

Blocks (040809): 1000 1001 1002 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3021

Blocks (040902): 1037 1038 1039 1076 1082 3006 3007 3008 3012 3032 3045

Blocks (040903): 1084 1087 1088

Blocks (040904): 3004 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3018 3019 3020

Blocks (040905): 3051 3052 3053 3054 3055 3056 3057 3058 3059 3060 3061 3062 3063 3064 3065 3067 3068 3069 3070

VTD: 07-2 Riverdale High School

VTD: 07-3 Middle TN Electric Membership Corp

VTD: 08-1 Blackman United Methodist Church

Blocks (040807): 1017 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3014 3015 3016 3022 3024 3025 3026 3027

Blocks (040808): 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037

Blocks (040902): 2016 2017 2018 2040 2041 2042 2052 2055 2056 2057 2058

VTD: 08-2 Eagleville Community Center

VTD: 08-3 Lebanon Camp Church

VTD: 08-4 Rockvale Community Center

VTD: 09-1 Stewart Creek Elementary

Blocks (040806): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 4002 4004 4005 4006 4007 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4029 4032 4033 4034

Blocks (040807): 1002 1004 1006 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1018 1019 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012

VTD: 10-2 Stewartsboro School

Blocks (040806): 4001

VTD: 13-1 Bellwood School

VTD: 13-2 World Outreach Church

VTD: 18-1 Patterson Park

Blocks (041600): 3045 3046 3052 3053 3054 3055 3056 3057 3058 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4026 4027

Blocks (041800): 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3048 3050 3054 3055 3057

Blocks (041900): 1000 1001 1002 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 3000 3001 3002 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022

Blocks (042000): 1004 1018 2003 2004 2007 2008 2009 2012

Blocks (042100): 1032 1033 1034

VTD: 18-2 Mid TN Realtors Association Bldg

Blocks (040905): 1004 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 2014 2020 2021

VTD: 18-3 Wilderness Station III

VTD: 19-1 Mitchell Neilson Primary

Blocks (040901): 1085 1086 1089

VTD: 19-3 Lane Agri-Park

Blocks (040901): 1087

Blocks (040902): 1062 1063 1077 1085

VTD: 20-1 Creekmont General Baptist Church

Blocks (040808): 1001 1002

VTD: 20-2 Blackman Middle School

Blocks (040902): 1000 1001 1002 1036 1040 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1052 1053 1054 1058 1059 1060 1061 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1078 1079 1080 1081 1084 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2053 2054 2059 2060 2061

Blocks (042300): 1161 1162 1164 1165 1166 1167 1168 1169 1170 1171 1172 1173 1174 1175 1176 1177 1178 1180 1181 1182 1183 1184

District 35:

Claiborne County

Grainger County

Union County

VTD: 1-1 Maynardville Elementary

Blocks (040100): 5057 5059 5060 5065 5066 5067 5068 5069 5071 5072 5073 5074 5075 5076 5077 5078 5079 5080 5081 5082 5083

Blocks (040201): 2010

VTD: 2-2 Luttrell Elementary School

Blocks (040100): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2071 2072 2073 2074 2075 2076 2077 2078 2079 2080 2081 2082 2083 2084 2085 2086 2087 2088 2089 2090 2091 2092 2093 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3050 3051 3052 3053 3054 3055 3056 4017 4019 4020

VTD: 3-3 Brock Community Center

VTD: 5-10 Sharps Chapel Elementary

VTD: 5-13 Bradens School House

District 36:

Anderson County

VTD: Andersonville

VTD: Clinch Valley

Blocks (020902): 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3022 3023 3024 3025

VTD: Fairview

Blocks (020901): 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3050 3051 3052 3053 3054 3055 3056 3057 3058 3062 3063 3064 3065 3066 3067 3068 3069 3070 3071 3072 3073 3074 3075 3076 3077 3078 3079 3080 3081 3082 3083 3084 3085 3086 3087 3088 3089 3090 3091 3092 3093 3094 3095 3096 3097 3098 3099 3100 3101 3102 3103 3104 3105 3106 3107 3108 3109 3110 3113

Blocks (020902): 3018 3019 3020 3021 3041 3042 3043 3044 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017

VTD: Lake City

Blocks (020800): 1036 1037 1039 1040 1041 1042 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1099 1100 1101 1103 1104 1108 1109 1110 1111 1115 1116 1140

VTD: Lake City Middle School

Blocks (020800): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1038 1043 1044 1105 1106 1107 1117 1118 1119 1120 1121 1122 1123 1124 1125 1126 1127 1128 1129 1130 1131 1132 1133 1134 1135 1136 1137 1138 1139 1141 1142 1144

VTD: Norris

Campbell County

Union County

VTD: 1-1 Maynardville Elementary

Blocks (040100): 4003 4030 4035 4037 4038 4039 4051 4073 5063 5064

Blocks (040201): 1021 1031 1032 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1041 1042 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1061 1062 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3050 3051 3052 3053 3055 3056 3057 3062 3063 3064

Blocks (040202): 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2058 4000 4001 4002 4003 4008 4015 4057 4058 4059 4060 4062

VTD: 2-2 Luttrell Elementary School

Blocks (040100): 3019 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 4000 4001 4002 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4018 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4031 4032 4033 4034 4036 4040 4041 4042 4043 4044 4045 4046 4047 4048 4049 4050 4052 4053 4054 4055 4056 4057 4058 4059 4060 4061 4062 4063 4064 4065 4066 4067 4068 4069 4070 4071 4072 4074

Blocks (040201): 3054 3058 3059 3060 3061

Blocks (040202): 4046

VTD: 3-2 Cedar Grove Community Cen.

VTD: 4-7 Big Ridge Elementary Sch.

VTD: 6-5 Plainview Community Center

VTD: 6-6 Paulette Community Center

District 37:

Rutherford County

VTD: 01-1 LaVergne City Hall

Blocks (040101): 1002 1003 1005 1006 1009 1010 1011 1012

VTD: 01-2 Roy Waldron School

Blocks (040101): 1000 1001 1004 1007 1008 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034

Blocks (040102): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015

Blocks (040103): 1000 1001 1002 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1014 1015 1016 1017 1029 1030 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1057 1058 1064 1072 1073

Blocks (042200): 3027 3028

VTD: 02-2 Walter Hill School

Blocks (040501): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1013 1014 1016 1018 1019 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 3026 3035 3036 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046

Blocks (041000): 1041 1059

VTD: 03-1 Leana Community Center

VTD: 03-2 Nissan Activity Center

VTD: 03-3 Wilson Elementary School

Blocks (040403): 4000 4001 4004 4011 4012 4036 4037 4040 4044 4045

Blocks (040501): 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1015 1017 1020 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3037 3038 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4029 4030 4031 4032 4033 4034 4035 4036

Blocks (042200): 3000 3001 3004 3029

VTD: 05-1 First Baptist Church of LaVergne

Blocks (040103): 1003 1004 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070

VTD: 07-1 Blackman Elementary School

Blocks (040902): 1029

VTD: 11-1 Smyrna Middle School

Blocks (042200): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1008 1009 1010 1011 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055

VTD: 12-1 Tennessee Rehab Center

Blocks (040403): 1004 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2008 2009 2011 2012 2014 2015 2023 2024 2025 3002 3006 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3022 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 4015 4035 4038 4039 4041 4042 4043

Blocks (042200): 1018 1019 1020 1021 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 3025 3063 3064 3065 3066 3073 3074 3075 3076 3077 3078 3079 3080 3082 3083 3084 3092

Blocks (042300): 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1045 1046 1047 1085 1086 1087

VTD: 14-1 Northfield Elementary School

VTD: 14-2 Siegal Elementary School

Blocks (041000): 1039 1040 1042 1043 1047 1048

Blocks (041301): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2013 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017

VTD: 15-1 Kingwood Church of Christ

Blocks (041402): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 2009 2010 2011 2012 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4007 4008

Blocks (041600): 1000 1001

VTD: 16-1 Central Middle School

VTD: 16-2 Mitchell Neilson Elementary

VTD: 19-1 Mitchell Neilson Primary

Blocks (040901): 1031 1042 1043 1044 1062 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1082 2073

Blocks (041302): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033

Blocks (041700): 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1032 1033 1037 1038 1040 1041 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3021 3022 4004 4005

VTD: 19-2 Seigel Middle School

VTD: 19-3 Lane Agri-Park

Blocks (040901): 1020 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1030 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1039 1040 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1066 1067 1070 1071 1081 1083 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098

Blocks (040902): 1055 1056 1057 1083

VTD: 20-2 Blackman Middle School

Blocks (040901): 1021 1029 1099 1101

Blocks (040902): 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1041 1048 1049 1050 1051

District 38:

Clay County

Fentress County

VTD: Allardt

VTD: Armathwaite

VTD: Community Center

VTD: Crossroads

VTD: Pall Mall

VTD: Pine Haven

VTD: West Fentress

Macon County

Pickett County

Scott County

District 39:

Franklin County

VTD: 1-1 FC Annex

VTD: 2-1 Clark Memorial

VTD: 3-1 Broadview

VTD: 3-2 Huntland

Blocks (960800): 1027 1028 1029 1030 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1114 1115 1116 1117 1118 1119 1120 1121 1122 1123 1124 1125 1130 1131 1132 1137 1142 1143 1144 1145 1146 1147 1148 1149 1150 1151 1152 1153 1154 1155 1156 1158 1159 1164 1165 1166 1177 1178 1179 1181 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070

VTD: 3-3 Old Salem

VTD: 4-1 Belvidere

VTD: 4-2 Cowan

VTD: 4-3 Liberty

VTD: 5-1 Keith Springs

Blocks (960600): 3060 3062 3063 3067 3078 3080 3085 3088 3089 3092 3094 3095 3096 3097 3098 3099 3100 3102 3103 3109 3117 3123 3135

Blocks (960700): 2120

Blocks (960800): 1138 1139

VTD: 5-2 Sewanee

VTD: 5-3 Sherwood

Blocks (960600): 1206

Blocks (960700): 2047 2050 2051 2053 2054 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065 2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2071 2072 2073 2074 2077 2081 2085 2088 2089 2094 2100 2101 2102 2103 2105 2106 2107 2108 2109 2121 2122 2123 2124 2125 2140 2141 2142 2143

VTD: 6-1 Alto/Oak Grove

VTD: 6-2 Capitol Hill

VTD: 6-3 UTSI

VTD: 7-1 North Lake

VTD: 7-2 Winchester Springs & Center Grove

VTD: 8-1 Decherd

VTD: 8-2 Estill Springs

Marion County

VTD: Battle Creek

VTD: Elder Mountain

VTD: Foster Falls

VTD: Haletown-Ladds

VTD: Lusk Store

VTD: Mineral Springs

VTD: Monteagle

VTD: Powells Crossroads

VTD: Sequatchie

VTD: Waldens Ridge

VTD: Whitwell

VTD: Whitwell Mtn. FD

Moore County

District 40:

DeKalb County

VTD: 1-1 Alexandria

VTD: 1-2 Temperence Hall

VTD: 1-3 Edgar Evins State Park

VTD: 2-1 Liberty

VTD: 2-2 Dowelltown

VTD: 2-3 Snows Hill

VTD: 3 Middle School

Blocks (920101): 1023 1024 1025 1026 1031 1033 1034 1035 1036 1039 1040 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1058 1059 1060 1061

Blocks (920200): 2009 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008 3009 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3050 3051 3052 3053 3054 3055 3056 3057 3058 3059 3060 3061 3062 3063 3064 3065 3066 3076 3077 3078 3079 3088 3089 3090 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028 4030 4031 4032 4033 4034 4035 4041 4049 4050

Blocks (920300): 1071
